Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 10. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 64.2-1076.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1077.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede § 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b).

History.

2022, c. 354.

§ 64.2-1078.
Application to trust or estate.

This chapter applies to a trust or estate existing or created on or after July 1, 2022, except as otherwise expressly provided in the terms of the trust or this chapter.

History.

2022, c. 354.